Mississippi, session 2026, HB730.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 97-29-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-29-59.  Every person who shall be convicted of the detestable and abominable crime against nature committed * * *with mankind or with a beast, shall be punished by imprisonment in the Penitentiary for a term of not more than ten (10) years. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.